Wyoming, session 2026, SF0021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 40-31-103(a) and 40-31-106(a), (b),
(c)(i), by creating a new paragraph (ii), by amending and
renumbering (ii) and (iii) as (iii) and (iv) and by
creating new subsections (d) and (e) are amended to read:
40-31-103. Wyoming stable token commission.
(a) There is created the Wyoming stable token
commission, which is a body politic and corporate operating
as an instrumentality of the state of Wyoming, with
authority to adopt an official seal and to sue and be sued.
The commission may enter into agreements with other states
for the purposes of consulting, coordinating and
facilitating the use of Wyoming stable tokens issued by the
commission under this act.
40-31-106. Wyoming stable token accounts.
(a) The Wyoming stable token trust account is
created. The commission shall deposit all funds received
for the issuance of Wyoming stable tokens into the account.
Funds within the account received from the sale of Wyoming
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0021
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
stable tokens shall be held in trust to support the
redemption of Wyoming stable tokens, and shall not be
expended for any other purpose but shall be expended to
redeem Wyoming stable tokens. The commission shall invest
funds within the account exclusively in cash, United States
treasury securities with a maturity of three hundred
sixty-five (365) days or less, or United States treasury
security repurchase agreements with a term of thirty (30)
days or less or in compliance with 17 C.F.R. part 270.2a-7.
By creation of this trust, the state does not create any
fiduciary duty to token holders. Investment earnings
generated by the funds in the account may be deposited in
the Wyoming stable token administration account as provided
in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) Not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the
notional value of all outstanding issued Wyoming stable
tokens shall be maintained in the Wyoming stable token
trust account. All earnings paid on funds and investments
in the account shall be deposited in the account.
Investment earnings on funds in the account in excess of
one hundred two percent (102%) one hundred percent (100%)
of the notional value of all outstanding issued Wyoming
stable tokens shall be transferred to the Wyoming stable
token administration account.
(c) The Wyoming stable token administration account
is created. Funds received into the account from any source
shall be retained, expended or transferred and are
continuously appropriated according to for the following:
priority:
(i) To pay for the operational costs of this act
until all operational costs of this act are fully paid;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0021
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) After payment of operational costs, to be
transferred to the Wyoming stable token liquidity account
created in subsection (d) of this section in amounts
necessary to maintain in the liquidity account an amount
equal to two percent (2%) of the notional value of all
outstanding issued Wyoming stable tokens;
(ii)(iii) Retention of From any funds remaining
after the expenditures and transfers required by paragraphs
(i) and (ii) of this subsection, funds in the
administration account shall be retained in the
administration account for savings in an amount consistent
with rules set by the commission to provide for future
expenditures under paragraph (i) of this subsection;
(iii)(iv) Any remainder Amounts remaining in the
administration account after the application of paragraphs
(i) through (iii) of this subsection shall be distributed
on a quarterly basis, into the public school foundation
program account created by W.S. 21-13-306(a).
(d) The Wyoming stable token liquidity account is
created. The commission shall maintain in the liquidity
account an amount equal to two percent (2%) of the notional
value of all outstanding issued Wyoming stable tokens as a
reserve amount. Funds in the liquidity account are
continuously appropriated to the commission for the purpose
of maintaining a reserve amount as required by this
subsection and for transferring funds to the Wyoming stable
token trust account to mitigate losses incurred in the
liquidation of assets held in the trust account and to
support the redemption of Wyoming stable tokens as provided
by this act. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prohibit the commission from transferring funds from the
liquidity account to the Wyoming stable token trust account
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0021
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
for redemption support. For purposes of this act, funds in
the Wyoming stable token liquidity account shall not be
treated as part of the Wyoming stable token trust account.
(e) The commission may, subject to rules promulgated
by the commission, accept federal grants and other
contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and
donations from any source for deposit into any account
created in this section, provided that funds deposited into
an account under this section shall be subject to the
requirements of that account.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0021
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5